Utah statutes.
13-15-7.   Civil penalty for violation of cease and desist order.
Any person who violates any cease and desist order issued under this chapter
is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation. Civil
penalties authorized by this chapter may be imposed in any civil action
brought by the attorney general or by a county attorney under this section.
All penalties received shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education
and Training Fund created in Section 13-2-8.  No action to collect a civil
penalty may be commenced more than five years after the date the penalty was
imposed.
